Illinois, session 104th, HB4338.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Condominium and Common Interest Community 5Ombudsperson Act is amended by changing Sections 10, 20, 25, 630, and 40 as follows: 7    (765 ILCS 615/10)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)9    Sec. 10. Findings. The General Assembly finds as follows: 10        (1) Managing condominium property or common interest 11    community property is a complex responsibility. Unit 12    owners and persons charged with managing condominium 13    property or common interest community property may have 14    little or no prior experience in managing real property, 15    operating a not-for-profit association or corporation, 16    complying with the laws governing condominium property or 17    common interest community property, and interpreting and 18    enforcing restrictions and rules imposed by applicable 19    instruments or covenants. Unit owners may not fully 20    understand their rights and obligations under the law or 21    applicable instruments or covenants. Mistakes and 22    misunderstandings are inevitable and may lead to serious, 23    costly, and divisive problems. This Act seeks to educate   HB4338- 2 -LRB104 15964 JRC 29205 b1    unit owners, condominium associations, common interest 2    community associations, boards of managers, and boards of 3    directors about the Condominium Property Act and the 4    Common Interest Community Association Act. Effective 5    education can prevent or reduce the severity of problems 6    within a condominium or common interest community.7        (2) Anecdotal accounts of abuses within condominiums 8    and common interest communities create continuing public 9    demand for reform of condominium and common interest 10    community property law. This results in frequent changes 11    to the law, making it difficult to understand and apply, 12    and imposes significant transitional costs on these 13    communities statewide. By collecting empirical data on the 14    nature and incidence of problems within these communities, 15    this Act will provide a sound basis for prioritizing 16    reform efforts, thereby increasing the stability of 17    condominium and common interest community property law.18        (3) Condominium ownership is one of the most 19    significant financial investments for Illinois residents, 20    particularly in urban areas, such as Chicago. A growing 21    number of condominium owners report misconduct, 22    negligence, and obstruction from condominium boards and 23    property management firms, causing diminished 24    transparency, loss of property value, and emotional 25    distress. Although the Office of the Condominium and 26    Common Interest Ombudsperson is charged with licensing   HB4338- 3 -LRB104 15964 JRC 29205 b1    community association managers, it lacks sufficient 2    mechanisms for timely enforcement, mediation, and public 3    accountability. Vulnerable populations, particularly 4    seniors, low-income residents, and individuals in smaller 5    associations, face disproportionate harm because of the 6    cost of legal representation and the absence of accessible 7    administrative remedies. It is, therefore, necessary to 8    strength the Office's enforcement authority and ensure 9    fair governance through education and accountability 10    measures. 11(Source: P.A. 98-1135, eff. 1-1-17 (See Section 20 of P.A. 1299-776 for effective date of P.A. 98-1135).) 13    (765 ILCS 615/20)14    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)15    Sec. 20. Office of the Condominium and Common Interest 16Community Ombudsperson. 17    (a) There is created in the Division of Real Estate within 18the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, under 19the supervision and control of the Secretary, the Office of 20the Condominium and Common Interest Community Ombudsperson. 21    (b) The Department shall name an Ombudsperson and other 22persons as necessary to discharge the requirements of this 23Act. The Ombudsperson shall have the powers delegated to him 24or her by the Department, in addition to the powers set forth 25in this Act.   HB4338- 4 -LRB104 15964 JRC 29205 b1    (c) Neither the Ombudsperson nor the Department shall have 2any authority to consider matters that may constitute grounds 3for charges or complaints under the Illinois Human Rights Act 4or that are properly brought before the Department of Human 5Rights or the Illinois Human Rights Commission, before a 6comparable department or body established by a county, 7municipality, or township pursuant to an ordinance prohibiting 8discrimination and established for the purpose of 9investigating and adjudicating charges or complaints of 10discrimination under the ordinance, or before a federal agency 11or commission that administers and enforces federal 12anti-discrimination laws and investigates and adjudicates 13charges or complaints of discrimination under such laws. 14    (d) Information and advice provided by the Ombudsperson 15has no binding legal effect and is not subject to the 16provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.17    (e) The Office is authorized to receive, investigate, and 18mediate complaints from unit owners regarding misconduct, 19governance violations, or denial of lawful request for 20records; recommend corrective actions; and refer substantiated 21complaints to the appropriate enforcement unit of the 22Department. Subject to the confidentiality provisions in 23Section 45 of this Act and except as otherwise protected by 24law, the Office, the Department, or both may compel the 25production of documents, minutes, or financial statements 26necessary to investigate complaints.   HB4338- 5 -LRB104 15964 JRC 29205 b1(Source: P.A. 98-1135, eff. 1-1-17 (See Section 20 of P.A. 299-776 for effective date of P.A. 98-1135); 99-776, eff. 38-12-16.) 4    (765 ILCS 615/25)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)6    Sec. 25. Training and education. 7    (a) On or before July 1, 2017, the Ombudsperson shall 8offer training, outreach, and educational materials, including 9but not limited to, materials concerning fiduciary duties, 10ethical obligations, and statutory requirements, and may 11arrange for the offering of courses to unit owners, 12associations, boards of managers, and boards of directors in 13subjects relevant to: (i) the operation and management of 14condominiums and common interest communities; and (ii) the 15Condominium Property Act and the Common Interest Community 16Association Act. 17    (b) Every elected or appointed member of a condominium or 18common interest community board must, within 12 months of 19election or appointment, complete a certified governance and 20fiduciary training program. The Office must make available 21online to all board members free or at low-cost such a program, 22which includes instruction on the following:23        (1) fiduciary duties and conflict of interest 24    avoidance;25        (2) financial management and transparency   HB4338- 6 -LRB104 15964 JRC 29205 b1    requirements;2        (3) member rights and procedures for access to 3    records; and4        (4) ethical standards of conduct and penalties for 5    misconduct. 6(Source: P.A. 98-1135, eff. 1-1-17 (See Section 20 of P.A. 799-776 for effective date of P.A. 98-1135); 99-776, eff. 88-12-16.) 9    (765 ILCS 615/30)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)11    Sec. 30. Website; toll-free number. 12    (a) The Office shall maintain on the Department's website 13the following information: 14        (1) the text of this Act, the Condominium Property 15    Act, the Common Interest Community Association Act, and 16    any other statute, administrative rule, or regulation that 17    the Ombudsperson determines is relevant to the operation 18    and management of a condominium association or common 19    interest community association; 20        (2) information concerning non-judicial resolution of 21    disputes that may arise within a condominium or common 22    interest community, including, but not limited to, 23    alternative dispute resolution programs and contacts for 24    locally-available dispute resolution programs; 25        (3) a description of the services provided by the   HB4338- 7 -LRB104 15964 JRC 29205 b1    Ombudsperson and information on how to contact the 2    Ombudsperson for assistance; and 3        (4) any other information that the Ombudsperson 4    determines is useful to unit owners, associations, boards 5    of managers, and boards of directors; and . 6        (5) a publicly accessible database listing enforcement 7    actions against licensed community association managers 8    and management companies that includes the nature of the 9    violation, date of enforcement action, type of penalty or 10    corrective measure, and status of compliance or appeal. 11    (b) The Office may make available during regular business 12hours a statewide toll-free telephone number to provide 13information and resources on matters relating to condominium 14property and common interest community property.15(Source: P.A. 98-1135, eff. 1-1-17 (See Section 20 of P.A. 1699-776 for effective date of P.A. 98-1135); 99-776, eff. 178-12-16.) 18    (765 ILCS 615/40)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)20    Sec. 40. Dispute resolution. 21    (a) Beginning on July 1, 2020, and subject to 22appropriation, unit owners meeting the requirements of this 23Section may make a written request, as outlined in subsection 24(f) of this Section, to the Ombudsperson for assistance in 25resolving a dispute between a unit owner and an association   HB4338- 8 -LRB104 15964 JRC 29205 b1that involves a violation of the Condominium Property Act or 2the Common Interest Community Association Act. 3    (b) The Ombudsperson shall not accept requests for 4resolutions of disputes with community association managers, 5supervising community association managers, or community 6association management firms, as defined in the Community 7Association Manager Licensing and Disciplinary Act. 8    (c) The Ombudsperson shall not accept requests for 9resolutions of disputes for which there is a pending complaint 10filed in any court or administrative tribunal in any 11jurisdiction or for which arbitration or alternative dispute 12resolution is scheduled to occur or has previously occurred. 13    (d) The assistance described in subsection (a) of this 14Section is available only to unit owners. In order for a unit 15owner to receive the assistance from the Ombudsperson 16described in subsection (a) of this Section, the unit owner 17must: 18        (1) owe no outstanding assessments, fees, or funds to 19    the association, unless the assessments, fees, or funds 20    are central to the dispute; 21        (2) allege a dispute that was initiated, or initially 22    occurred, within the 2 calendar years preceding the date 23    of the request; 24        (3) have made a written complaint pursuant to the unit 25    owner's association's complaint policy, as outlined in 26    Section 35, which alleged violations of the Condominium   HB4338- 9 -LRB104 15964 JRC 29205 b1    Property Act or the Common Interest Community Association 2    Act; 3        (4) have received a final and adverse decision from 4    the association and attach a copy of the association's 5    final adverse decision marked "final" to the request to 6    the Ombudsperson; and 7        (5) have filed the request within 30 days after the 8    receipt of the association's final adverse decision. 9    (e) A unit owner who has not received a response, marked 10"final", to his or her complaint from the association within a 11reasonable time may request assistance from the Ombudsperson 12pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section if the unit owner 13meets the requirements of items (1), (2), and (3) of 14subsection (d) of this Section. A unit owner may not request 15assistance from the Ombudsperson until at least 90 days after 16the initial written complaint was submitted to the 17association. The Ombudsperson may decline a unit owner's 18request for assistance on the basis that a reasonable time has 19not yet passed. 20    (f) The request for assistance shall be in writing, on 21forms provided electronically by the Office, and include the 22following: 23        (1) the name, address, and contact information of the 24    unit owner; 25        (2) the name, address, and contact information of the 26    association;   HB4338- 10 -LRB104 15964 JRC 29205 b1        (3) the applicable association governing documents 2    unless the absence of governing documents is central to 3    the dispute; 4        (4) the date of the final adverse decision by the 5    association; 6        (5) a copy of the association's written complaint 7    policy required under Section 35 of this Act; 8        (6) a copy of the unit owner's complaint to the 9    association with a specific reference to the alleged 10    violations of the Condominium Property Act or the Common 11    Interest Community Association Act; 12        (7) documentation verifying the unit owner's ownership 13    of a unit, such as a copy of a recorded deed or other 14    document conferring title; and 15        (8) a copy of the association's adverse decision 16    marked "final", if applicable. 17    (g) On receipt of a unit owner's request for assistance 18that the Department determines meets the requirements of this 19Section, the Ombudsperson shall, within the limits of the 20available resources, confer with the interested parties and 21assist in efforts to resolve the dispute by mutual agreement 22of the parties. 23    (h) The Office must establish a Condominium Mediation and 24Arbitration Program that allows owners and associations to 25voluntarily resolve disputes before litigation involving 26governance, access to information, and enforcement of rules.   HB4338- 11 -LRB104 15964 JRC 29205 b1Mediation proceedings are confidential, but outcomes may be 2summarized anonymously in the Ombudsperson's annual report for 3data purposes. The Ombudsperson shall assist only opposing 4parties who mutually agree to participate in dispute 5resolution. 6    (i) A unit owner is limited to one request for assistance 7per dispute. The meaning of dispute is to be broadly 8interpreted by the Department. 9    (j) The Department has the authority to determine whether 10or not a final decision is adverse under paragraph (4) of 11subsection (d) of this Section. 12    (k) The Department shall, on or before July 1, 2020, 13establish rules describing the time limit, method, and manner 14for dispute resolution. 15    (l) (Blank). 16(Source: P.A. 98-1135, eff. 1-1-17 (See Section 20 of P.A. 1799-776 for effective date of P.A. 98-1135); 99-776, eff. 188-12-16.)